
−DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI−215

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC C0226 /2 1 toC0256 /24 ABSSolenoidCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This solenoid goes on when signals are received from the ECU and controls the pressure acting on the wheel
cylinders thus controlling the braking force.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C0226 /2 1
Openorshort circuit inSFRHorSFRRcircuit continues for
0.015sec.ormore.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFRHorSFRRcircuit

C0236 / 22
Openorshort circuit inSFLHorSFLRcircuit continues for
0.015sec.ormore.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFLHorSFLRcircuit

C0246 / 23
Openorshort circuit inSRRHorSRRRcircuit continues for
0.015sec.ormore.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSRRHorSRRRcircuit

C0256 / 24
Openorshort circuit inSRLHorSRLRcircuit continues for
0.015sec.ormore.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSRLHorSRLRcircuit
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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−DIAGNOSTICS ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI−217

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check hydraulic brake booster solenoid.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each of terminals A48 − 4 and A50
− 1, 2, 3, 4, 7, 8, 9 and 10 of hydraulic brake booster connector.
OK:

Continuity
HINT:
Resistance of each solenoid at 20 ˚ C (68 ˚ F)
SFRH, SFLH, SRRH, SRLH: 6.95 − 7.45 �
SFRR, SFLR, SRRR, SRLR: 2.00 − 2.40 �

NG Replace hydraulic brake booster.

OK

2 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between skid control
ECU and actuator (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.


